California, session 20252026, AB2652.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 44282 of the Education Code is amended to read:44282. (a) The commission shall adopt examinations and assessments to verify the subject matter knowledge and competence of candidates for the single subject teaching credentials described in Section 44257 and the concentrations described in Section 44257.2.(b) A general subject matter examination authorizing teaching multiple subjects shall include an examination of the candidate’s knowledge of the following areas: language studies, literature, mathematics, science, social studies, history, the arts, physical education, and human development.(c) In a world language for which the commission does not administer a subject matter examination, a candidate may fulfill, through the successful completion of a comparable postsecondary language proficiency assessment, including, but not limited to, those maintained by the ACTFL, either of the following:(1) The subject matter requirement of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259 for a preliminary single subject teaching credential in world language pursuant to Section 44257.(2) The language requirement for an authorization pursuant to Section 44253.3, 44253.4, or 44253.7.